Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1036.
do enact as follows:SB1036,11Section 1. 100.20 (1v) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1036,2,42100.20 (1v) It is an unfair method of competition in business or an unfair 3trade practice for a person or business entity to violate s. 100.2085 (1) or (2) or 4100.70 (1).SB1036,25Section 2. 100.20 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1036,2,106100.20 (5) Any person suffering pecuniary loss because of a violation by any 7other person of s. 100.2085 or 100.70 or any order issued under this section may sue 8for damages therefor in any court of competent jurisdiction and shall recover twice 9the amount of such pecuniary loss, together with costs, including a reasonable 10attorney fee.SB1036,311Section 3. 100.20 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1036,3,412100.20 (6) The department may commence an action in circuit court in the 13name of the state to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction the violation of 14s. 100.2085 or 100.70 or any order issued under this section. The court may in its 15discretion, prior to entry of final judgment make such orders or judgments as may 16be necessary to restore to any person any pecuniary loss suffered because of the acts 1or practices involved in the action, provided proof thereof is submitted to the 2satisfaction of the court. The department may use its authority in ss. 93.14 and 393.15 to investigate violations of s. 100.2085 or 100.70 or any order issued under 4this section.SB1036,45Section 4. 100.2085 of the statutes is created to read:SB1036,3,76100.2085 Broadband and other Internet services. (1) Broadband and 7other Internet speeds. No person may do any of the following:SB1036,3,148(a) Advertise or otherwise represent that the person provides broadband 9service unless a service provided by the person is capable of consistently providing 10a minimum download speed of 100 megabits per second and a minimum upload 11speed of 20 megabits per second or the minimum download and upload speeds for 12advanced telecommunications capability as designated by the federal 13communications commission in its inquiries regarding advanced 14telecommunications capability under 47 USC 1302 (b).SB1036,3,2115(b) Sell or offer to sell a service that the person represents, to a consumer 16purchasing the service, as being broadband service unless the service is capable of 17consistently providing that consumer with a minimum download speed of 100 18megabits per second and a minimum upload speed of 20 megabits per second or the 19minimum download and upload speeds for advanced telecommunications capability 20as designated by the federal communications commission in its inquiries regarding 21advanced telecommunications capability under 47 USC 1302 (b).SB1036,4,222(c) Advertise or otherwise represent that the person provides Internet service 1at a specific minimum speed unless a service provided by the person is capable of 2consistently providing that speed.SB1036,4,53(d) Sell or offer to sell Internet service that the person represents, to a 4consumer purchasing the service, as being a specific minimum speed unless the 5service is capable of consistently providing that consumer with that speed.SB1036,4,126(2) Broadband labels. No person may sell or offer to sell broadband service 7in this state unless the person makes broadband labels easily available to potential 8consumers and provides a broadband label to every consumer before sale of the 9service to the consumer. A broadband label provided under this subsection shall 10use the templates for consumer labels for broadband service provided by the federal 11communications commission. A broadband label provided under this subsection 12may not contain any misleading or inaccurate information.SB1036,4,1813(3) Contract termination and refund. If a person makes a sale to a 14consumer in violation of sub. (1) (b) or (d), the consumer notifies the person in 15writing of the violation, and the person fails to remedy the violation within one 16month after receiving the notice, the consumer may terminate the consumer’s 17contract with the person and receive a refund for all charges and fees that the 18consumer paid to the person.SB1036,519Section 5. Effective date.SB1036,4,2120(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 21publication.SB1036,4,2222